District of Columbia statutes.
8-1825.06

Repealed

Colony disposition.

Repealed.

Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-262, § 216, 60 DCR 1300
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 411(e), 61 DCR 8045
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(h) of D.C. Law 20-142 provided that § 411 of the act shall apply as of December 17, 2014.